California, session 20252026, SB1296.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1942.7.5 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1942.7.5. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Landlord” means a person who owns or manages a residential real property or their agent.(2) “Pet” means an animal except for a service animal or support animal that a landlord is required to allow a tenant to have on a residential property premises pursuant to the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or the federal Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.). a “common household pet,” as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 50466 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) “Pet addendum” means a writing that is part of a lease agreement that sets forth the rules and conditions for maintaining pets on a residential rental property premises.(4) “Pet policy” means the rules and conditions conditions, including any prohibition, for maintaining pets on a residential rental property premises that is in writing. “Pet policy” shall also include policies that completely prohibit pets.(b)If a landlord does not allow a tenant to keep pets on a residential rental property premises, the landlord or their agent shall clearly disclose the no pet policy in any advertisement, rental application, or lease agreement for the property. The disclosure shall include a statement that the no pet policy does not apply to service animals or support animals that are required to be allowed on the premises pursuant to the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or the federal Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).(c)(b) A landlord that who allows a tenant to have a pet on the premises shall have a pet policy in writing and shall do all of the following:(1) Provide a hyperlink or other electronic means to access the property’s pet policy or pet addendum in all of the following, as applicable:(A) On the property’s internet website.(B)As part of any digital advertisement for the property under the control of the landlord.(B) In any digital advertisement under the complete control of the landlord and in any digital advertisement on a third-party internet website, only to the extent that the third party permits the inclusion of a hyperlink or other electronic access.(C) In any information provided by the landlord for to a residential rental search						engine. engine, only to the extent that the search engine permits or supports the inclusion of a hyperlink or other electronic access.(2) Provide a written copy or summary of the property’s established pet policy or pet addendum with any rental application form. If the rental application is provided electronically, the pet policy shall be provided electronically with the application.(d)(c) A landlord shall not be liable for any omission, error, or failure to display the property’s established written pet policy or its pet addendum on a third-party website or platform if the third party obtained, scraped, or republished information from the property’s internet website or digital advertisements without the express written permission of the landlord.(e)An established pet policy or pet addendum provided in accordance with this section shall include all of the following, to the extent applicable:(1)Any breed and weight restrictions.(2)Any required fees, including the specific dollar amount of each fee, for all of the following:(A)Upfront pet fees.(B)Refundable pet deposits.(C)Monthly pet fees, commonly referred to as pet rent.(3)Any limit on the number of pets allowed in a unit.(4)Any vaccination requirements.(5)Any liability insurance requirements.(6)Any other material rule, condition, or restriction applicable to a tenant keeping a pet at the property.(f)Pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 1950.5, a pet policy or pet addendum shall not characterize any upfront pet fee as nonrefundable.(d) An established pet policy or pet addendum provided in accordance with this section shall include a clear, plain-language description of the rights, responsibilities, and requirements for tenant pet owners at the property, including any other material, rules, conditions, or restrictions applicable to keeping a pet.(g)(e) A landlord may amend their established written pet policy or pet addendum prospectively. For purposes of this section, compliance shall be determined based on the established pet policy or pet addendum in effect at the time the rental application form is provided to a prospective applicant.(h)(f) A landlord substantially complies with this section if the landlord provides a prospective applicant with the material terms of the property’s established pet policy or its pet addendum as required by this section. A nonmaterial error or omission that is corrected upon notice shall not constitute a violation of this section.(i)(g) A rental application for a residential rental property subject to this section shall include both of the following: a space for a prospective tenant to acknowledge receipt of the property’s established pet policy or pet addendum.(1)A notice that if a landlord fails to provide a written pet policy or pet addendum pursuant to this section, and as result, an applicant is no longer eligible to rent the unit or declines to proceed with the application, the applicant is entitled to a refund of their application fee.(2)A space for a prospective tenant to acknowledge receipt of the property’s established pet policy or pet addendum.(j)(h) If a landlord or their agent charges an application fee pursuant to Section 1950.6 but fails to disclose the established pet policy or pet addendum in accordance with this section before charging the fee, and due to the landlord’s failure to disclose that information, the applicant is no longer eligible to rent the unit or declines to proceed with the application because of the pet policy, application, the landlord or their agent shall return the application fee to the applicant. A refund required by this subdivision shall be made within five business days after receiving written notice from the applicant. applicant of the failure to provide the established pet policy or pet addendum.(i) A tenant’s failure to sign a pet addendum shall not form the basis of any unlawful detainer action against the tenant.(k)(j) The refund of the application fee pursuant to subdivision (j) (h) is the sole remedy available under this section. This section does not create a private right of action for damages, penalties, injunctive relief, or attorneys’ attorney’s fees.(l)(k) This section does not require a landlord to allow pets on a residential rental property, to create an internet website for a residential rental property, or to digitally advertise a rental unit through any particular medium.(m)(l) This section does not alter, limit, expand, or affect any obligation or right under state or federal law relating to service animals, support animals, or other assistance animals.(m) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a landlord, consistent with other applicable law, to adopt, amend, interpret, or enforce an established written pet policy or standard pet addendum, or to deny or restrict pets based on the established pet policy or pet addendum, lease terms, health or safety concerns, property conditions, insurance requirements, or business reasons.(n) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2027.